North Carolina, session 2025, HB530.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HALIFAX COUNTY PUBLIC PROJECTS
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred fifteen million two hundred eleven thousand
seven hundred sixty-three dollars ($115,211,763) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year to provide the following directed grants to the following entities:
(1) Six hundred ten thousand nine hundred forty-four dollars ($610,944) to the
City of Roanoke Rapids for Chaloner Bridge replacement and drainage
improvements.
(2) Forty-five million two hundred eighty thousand eight hundred nineteen
dollars ($45,280,819) to the Roanoke Rapids Sanitary District to be allocated
as follows:
a. Four million eight hundred forty-seven thousand eight hundred
nineteen dollars ($4,847,819) for the Belmont Pump Station.
b. Six million two hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($6,218,000) for
the Premier Boulevard water/sewer extension.
c. Thirty-one million one hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($31,115,000)
for a drinking water emerging construction project.
d. Three million one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) for an
activated sludge blower system.
(3) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) to the Town of Enfield for its electric grid
replacement.
(4) Sixty-one million three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($61,320,000) to
Halifax County to be allocated as follows:
a. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for sewer line extension to Exit 154
on I-95.
b. Three hundred twenty thousand dollars ($320,000) for Airboss access
road.
c. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for court services building
renovation.
d. Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for a new county detention center.
*H530-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. One million dollars ($1,000,000) for broadband service expansion.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated to the Office of State Budget and
Management the sum of four million six hundred fifty thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars
($4,650,176) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide the following
directed grants:
(1) Five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) to Halifax County to be
allocated as follows:
a. Three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000) for a new ambulance.
b. Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for 18 self-contained
breathing apparatus for the Darlington Volunteer Fire Department.
(2) Seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to Halifax Fire and Rescue, Inc.,
to purchase a fire truck.
(3) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the Town of Enfield to upfit
fitness building and purchase apparatus for the Fire Department.
(4) Fifteen thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($15,176) to the Town of
Scotland Neck to purchase body cameras and other needed equipment for the
Police Department.
(5) Two million two hundred ten thousand dollars ($2,210,000) to the Town of
Roanoke Rapids for needs of its fire department, including a new ladder truck,
generator, and air packs.
(6) One million twenty-five thousand dollars ($1,025,000) to the Town of Weldon
to be allocated as follows:
a. Eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000) for a new fire engine.
b. One hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) for building
renovation and site preparation and a viper radio system purchase.

PART II. NORTHAMPTON COUNTY PUBLIC PROJECTS
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirteen million fifty thousand dollars ($13,050,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide directed grants to the following
entities:
(1) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to the Town of Rich Square for
wastewater treatment improvements.
(2) Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to the Town of Garysburg for water system
improvements.
(3) Two million one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,150,000) to the Town of
Seaboard to be allocated as follows:
a. Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for Community Center
renovation.
b. One million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000) for street
replacement and repairs.
c. Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for renovation of the Old
Seaboard Bank.
(4) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the Town of Woodland for the
construction of a new town hall.
(5) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to Northampton
County for wastewater treatment expansion.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated to the Office of State Budget and
Management the sum of four million seven hundred fifty-six thousand dollars ($4,756,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide the following directed grants:
Page 2 House Bill 530-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Six thousand dollars ($6,000) to the Town of Conway Police Department for
video conferencing equipment.
(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to the Town of Gaston for a heavy rescue
unit and tanker truck for its Volunteer Fire Department.
(3) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to the Town of Woodland for a
rescue truck for its Volunteer Fire Department.
(4) One million one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,150,000) to the Town of
Rich Square to renovate a building and to purchase a storage facility and
3,000-gallon tanker for its Volunteer Fire Department.
(5) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) to the Town of Severn for a
3,000-gallon tanker for its Volunteer Fire Department.
(6) Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) to the Town of Lasker for
building renovations and upgrades at its Volunteer Fire Department.

PART III. WARREN COUNTY PUBLIC PROJECTS
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirty-six million forty-two thousand five hundred thirty
dollars ($36,042,530) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide directed
grants to the following entities:
(1) Eighteen million two hundred ninety-two thousand five hundred thirty dollars
($18,292,530) to Warren County to be allocated as follows:
a. Five million four hundred thirty thousand five hundred dollars
($5,430,500) for a regional water system water tank.
b. Six million sixty-four thousand one hundred dollars ($6,064,100) for
extension of Eaton's Ferry Sewer.
c. Four million eight hundred three thousand three hundred dollars
($4,803,300) for the Soul City force main replacement.
d. Nine hundred ninety-four thousand six hundred thirty dollars
($994,630) for the Soul City Boulevard watermain replacement.
e. One million dollars ($1,000,000) for a waterline extension at the
Industrial Site in Soul City.
(2) Seventeen million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($17,750,000) to the
Town of Warrenton to be allocated as follows:
a. Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for wastewater treatment plant
rehabilitation.
b. Three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,750,000) for
sewer system rehabilitation.
c. Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for water system rehabilitation.
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated to the Office of State Budget and
Management the sum of nine million six hundred six thousand nine hundred twenty dollars
($9,606,920) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide the following
directed grants:
(1) Five million two hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($5,277,000) to
Warren County to be allocated as follows:
a. One million eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000) for the needs
of the Churchill-Five Forks Fire Department, including replacement
of fire engines, brush truck, rescue boat, and fire radios and purchase
of self-contained breathing apparatus equipment, rescue boat upgrade
or replacement, and mobile fire radio replacement.
b. One hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) to purchase a
brush truck for the Inez Volunteer Fire Department.
House Bill 530-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Five hundred ninety-two thousand dollars ($592,000) for the needs of
the Roanoke-Wildwood Volunteer Fire Department, including
self-contained breathing apparatus, boat motor, and water building.
d. One million four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($1,475,000)
for the needs of the Hawtree Volunteer Fire Department, including a
new fire truck, mortgage settlement, and self-contained breathing
apparatus.
e. Two hundred twenty-eight thousand dollars ($228,000) for the needs
of the Arcola Rural Volunteer Fire Department, including chief
support vehicle, storage facility, new cascade system, uniforms, floor
buffer, and a shipping container for training.
f. One hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($157,000) for the needs of
the Drewry Fire Department, including repairs to parking lot and
driveway and purchase of alarm system and garage door operators.
g. Eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000) for the needs of the
Soul City Volunteer Fire Department, including replacement of fire
engine and first responder vehicle.
(2) Three hundred twenty-nine thousand nine hundred twenty dollars ($329,920)
to the Town of Warrenton to be allocated as follows:
a. Thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to purchase body cameras for
the Police Department.
b. Two hundred ninety-four thousand nine hundred twenty dollars
($294,920) to the Town of Warrenton for the needs of the Rural
Volunteer Fire Department, including self-contained breathing
apparatus, inflatable raft/boat, and HVAC and equipment upgrades.
(3) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) to the Town of Norlina for a new fire
station.

PART IV. LAKE GASTON
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in recurring
funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used for a multiyear project to treat
lyngbya spp., a cyanobacteria, in Lake Gaston.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 4 House Bill 530-First Edition